Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 5. Right of Powerholder’s Creditors in Appointive Property.

§ 64.2-2735.
Creditor claim; general power created by powerholder.

As used in this section, “power of appointment created by the powerholder” includes a power of appointment created in a transfer by another person to the extent that the powerholder contributed value to the transfer.

Appointive property subject to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder is subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or of the powerholder’s estate to the extent provided in Chapter 4 (§

55.1-400

et seq.) of Title 55.1.

Subject to subsection B, appointive property subject to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder is not subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or the powerholder’s estate to the extent that the powerholder irrevocably appointed the property in favor of a person other than the powerholder or the powerholder’s estate.

Subject to subsections B and C, and notwithstanding the presence of a spendthrift provision or whether the claim arose before or after the creation of the power of appointment, appointive property subject to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder is subject to a claim of a creditor of:

The powerholder, to the same extent as if the powerholder owned the appointive property, if the power is presently exercisable; and

The powerholder’s estate, to the extent that the estate is insufficient to satisfy the claim and subject to the right of a decedent to direct the source from which liabilities are paid, if the power is exercisable at the powerholder’s death.

History.

2016, c. 266.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 4 (§

55.1-400

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 5 (§ 55-80 et seq.) of Title 55.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-244 Execution of Power of Appointment.

§ 64.2-2736.
Creditor claim; general power not created by powerholder.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, appointive property subject to a presently exercisable general power of appointment created by a person other than the powerholder is subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder to the extent that the powerholder’s property is insufficient.

Appointive property subject to a general power of appointment exercisable at the powerholder’s death is not subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or the powerholder’s estate except to the extent that the power is exercised in favor of the powerholder’s estate.

Subject to subsection C of §

64.2-2738

, a power of appointment created by a person other than the powerholder, which is subject to an ascertainable standard relating to an individual’s health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. § 2041(b)(1)(A) or 26 U.S.C. § 2514(c)(1), as amended, is treated for purposes of this article as a nongeneral power.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2737.
Power to withdraw.

For purposes of this article, and except as otherwise provided in subsection B, a power to withdraw property from a trust is treated, during the time the power may be exercised, as a presently exercisable general power of appointment to the extent of the property subject to the power to withdraw.

On the lapse, release, or waiver of a power to withdraw property from a trust, the power is treated as a presently exercisable general power of appointment only to the extent that the value of the property affected by the lapse, release, or waiver exceeds the greater of the amount specified in 26 U.S.C. § 2041(b)(2) and 26 U.S.C. § 2514(e) or two times the amount specified in 26 U.S.C. § 2503(b), as amended.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2738.
Creditor claim; nongeneral power.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections B and C, appointive property subject to a nongeneral power of appointment is exempt from a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or the powerholder’s estate.

Appointive property subject to a nongeneral power of appointment is subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or the powerholder’s estate to the extent that the powerholder owned the property and, reserving the nongeneral power, transferred the property in violation of Chapter 4 (§

55.1-400

et seq.) of Title 55.1.

If the initial gift in default of appointment is to the powerholder or the powerholder’s estate, a nongeneral power of appointment is treated for purposes of this article as a general power.

History.

2016, c. 266.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 4 (§

55.1-400

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 5 (§ 55-80 et seq.) of Title 55.”